ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="naběrač/ka__n">
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ek</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kám</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ku</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ko</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ky</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kce</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kách</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kou</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kami</l><r>ka<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="busol/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ám</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ách</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ou</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="klášte/r__n">
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ry</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ru</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rů</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ru</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rům</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ry</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>re</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ry</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ře</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rech</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rem</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ry</l><r>r<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="nacist/a__n">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>é</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ů</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ům</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>é</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ech</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ou</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>y</l><r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="souš/__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ím</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ích</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>í</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>emi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="k/ámen__n">
      <e><p><l>ámen</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameny</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amene</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amenů</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameni</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amenům</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ámen</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameny</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameni</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameny</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameni</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amenech</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>amenem</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ameny</l><r>ámen<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="alchymista"><i>alchymist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ateista"><i>ateist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baptista"><i>baptist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bohemista"><i>bohemist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="busola"><i>busol</i><par n="busol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buzola"><i>buzol</i><par n="busol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dokumentarista"><i>dokumentarist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="filatelista"><i>filatelist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="germanista"><i>germanist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="husita"><i>husit</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kámen"><i>k</i><par n="k/ámen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karikaturista"><i>karikaturist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klášter"><i>klášte</i><par n="klášte/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kopista"><i>kopist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lobbista"><i>lobbist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motocyklista"><i>motocyklist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naběračka"><i>naběrač</i><par n="naběrač/ka__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protagonista"><i>protagonist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="recidivista"><i>recidivist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sólista"><i>sólist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turista"><i>turist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vuvuzela"><i>vuvuzel</i><par n="busol/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alchymista"><i>alchymist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antisemita"><i>antisemit</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="badmintonista"><i>badmintonist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barytonista"><i>barytonist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baskytarista"><i>baskytarist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buddhista"><i>buddhist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cyklista"><i>cyklist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dokumentarista"><i>dokumentarist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="exhibicionista"><i>exhibicionist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="extremista"><i>extremist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="federalista"><i>federalist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flétnista"><i>flétnist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galerista"><i>galerist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="golfista"><i>golfist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hokejbalista"><i>hokejbalist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="humorista"><i>humorist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="impresionista"><i>impresionist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="invalida"><i>invalid</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jezuita"><i>jezuit</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karatista"><i>karatist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klarinetista"><i>klarinetist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komparzista" r="LR"><p><l>komparsist</l><r>komparzist</r></p><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kopista"><i>kopist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="labourista"><i>labourist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marxista"><i>marxist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modernista"><i>modernist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motocyklista"><i>motocyklist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nacionalista"><i>nacionalist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="optimista"><i>optimist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="penzista" r="LR"><p><l>pensist</l><r>penzist</r></p><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pianista"><i>pianist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prokurista"><i>prokurist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pólista"><i>pólist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="recesista"><i>recesist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scenárista"><i>scenárist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sionista"><i>sionist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slavista" r="LR"><p><l>slávist</l><r>slavist</r></p><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="specialista"><i>specialist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sólista"><i>sólist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tradicionalisty"><i>tradicionalist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turista"><i>turist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="violoncellista"><i>violoncellist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šíita"><i>šíit</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ženista"><i>ženist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ultranacionalista"><i>ultranacionalist</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="souš"><i>souš</i><par n="souš/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="despota"><i>despot</i><par n="nacist/a__n"/></e>
